Hawaii, session 2026, HB1817.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the population of native ʻamaʻama, also known as the striped mullet, has been in decline. Many factors contribute to the decline in ʻamaʻama, including the presence of the invasive Kanda mullet and the prized nature of ʻamaʻama in Hawaii.  The legislature further finds that the lifecycle of the ʻamaʻama is complex, as ʻamaʻama must reach three or four years of age before spawning, which occurs only during the winter months. Although the department of land and natural resources regulates the fishing season for ʻamaʻama, there is no statewide bag limit to prevent overfishing of ʻamaʻama. The legislature additionally finds that one of the most effective ways to help increase the population of ʻamaʻama is to establish a statewide bag limit.  A bag limit for ʻamaʻama has already been successfully implemented in Hilo Bay. Therefore, the purpose of this Act is to require the board of land and natural resources to adopt rules no later than June 30, 2030, establishing a statewide daily bag limit for ʻamaʻama per person during the open season. SECTION 2.  No later than June 30, 2030, the board of land and natural resources shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91, Hawaii Revised Statutes, to establish a statewide daily bag limit for ʻamaʻama (striped mullet) during the open season; provided that the rules shall apply only to areas without management plans as of the effective date of the rules. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.